Arkansas, session 2025, HB1436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 57, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-57-210. Location restrictions for certain food processing plants
operating a slaughterhouse — Definition.
(a)(1) As used in this section, "food processing plant" means a
commercial operation that processes food for human consumption and provides
processed food for sale and distribution to other entities.
(2) "Food processing plant" does not include a retail food
store, convenience store, food market, delicatessen, restaurant, or
cafeteria.
(b) A food processing plant operating a slaughterhouse on the same
grounds as the food processing plant that is located within a city of the
first class shall not operate within two (2) miles of a:
(1) Church;
*MBM136*
02/07/2025 2:36:27 PM MBM136

HB1436
(2) Public school; or
(3) Densely populated residential area.
(c) This section does not prevent a city of the first class from
undertaking a process to approve or otherwise regulate the operations of a
food processing plant operating a slaughterhouse on the same grounds as the
food processing plant, including without limitation making a determination
that the food processing plant would operate in violation of subsection (b)
of this section.
(d) This section does not apply to a food processing plant that is
operating on the effective date of this section.


























02/07/2025 2:36:27 PM MBM136